Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 4 Federal Aid to Towns

24-4-1.
Proposal to construct or reconstruct highway as federal aid project.

Any city or town, by resolution of its city or town council, may propose the construction or reconstruction of an appropriate street or highway within its municipal boundaries as a project eligible for participation in the benefits conferred by the Federal Aid Highway Act, 23 U.S.C. § 101 et seq., approved August 27, 1958, and all acts supplemental thereto and in amendment thereof, and may make appropriations therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1929, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-4-1

.

24-4-2.
Contents of resolution.

The resolution shall specifically describe the location of the proposed highway to be constructed or reconstructed; the total estimated costs of the project, and the type of the project.

The resolution shall further contain notice that necessary funds have been lawfully appropriated by the city or town in an amount equal to its share of the total estimated cost of the proposed project, and that the appropriation is available for the purposes set forth in the resolution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1929, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-4-2

.

24-4-3.
Forwarding resolution to director — Jurisdiction of negotiations.

A certified copy of the resolution shall be forwarded by the city or town clerk to the state director of transportation, under whose jurisdiction all negotiations between the federal government, the state and the city or town shall be completed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1929, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-4-3

.

24-4-4.
Preparation and forwarding of federal forms.

Whenever the director of transportation shall give his or her approval to any proposed project, the director shall forthwith cause to be prepared the appropriate forms in a manner satisfactory to the federal highway administration. The forms when so prepared shall be forwarded to the federal highway administrator for disposition as provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1929, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

24-4-4

.

24-4-5.
Federal aid highway matching account.

The general treasurer shall maintain as hereinafter provided, a special account to be known as the federal aid highway matching account, which shall be a part of the state highway construction funds.

Into the account shall be entered all money paid by any city or town on any project initiated and approved as herein provided for the purpose of matching federal grants and any state contribution to the projects.

From the account shall be paid all debts, claims, and other obligations legally incurred in the performance of the projects, and all the payments shall be authorized by vouchers approved and signed by the director of transportation or his or her authorized agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1929, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

24-4-5

; P.L. 1963, ch. 103, § 1.

24-4-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1929, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

24-4-6

; Repealed by P.L. 1963, ch. 103, § 2, effective May 6, 1963.

24-4-7.
Refund of surplus contributions to cities and towns.

In the event the actual cost on any project is less than the estimated cost as provided in the project agreement, the general treasurer shall refund to any city or town any money remaining from the actual contribution of the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1929, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

24-4-7

.

24-4-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1929, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

24-4-8

; P.L. 1963, ch. 103, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 3, effective July 1, 1988.